Washington statutes.
RCW 36.73.120

Imposition of fees on building construction or land development.

(1) Subject to the provisions in RCW 36.73.065, a district may impose a fee or charge on the construction or reconstruction of commercial buildings, industrial buildings, or on any other commercial or industrial building or building space or appurtenance, or on the development, subdivision, classification, or reclassification of land for commercial purposes, only if done in accordance with chapter 39.92 RCW.

(2) Any fee or charge imposed under this section shall be used exclusively for transportation improvements as defined in RCW 36.73.015. The fees or charges imposed must be reasonably necessary as a result of the impact of development, construction, or classification or reclassification of land on identified transportation needs.

(3) If a county or city within the district area is levying a fee or charge for a transportation improvement, the fee or charge shall be credited against the amount of the fee or charge imposed by the district.

[ 2010 c 105 s 2; 2007 c 329 s 4; 2005 c 336 s 11; 1988 c 179 s 7; 1987 c 327 s 12.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2005 c 336: See note following RCW 36.73.015.

Severability—Prospective application—Section captions—1988 c 179: See RCW 39.92.900 and 39.92.901.